Mississippi, session 2026, SB3306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money to the credit of the Mississippi Department of Transportation not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Department of Transportation to assist the Cities of Gautier and Ocean Springs, Mississippi, with the relocation of utilities along U.S. Highway 90 in order to immediately commence the widening project on U.S. Highway 90 for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027........................................... $ 10,000,000.00. SECTION 2.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his or her warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.